Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB116.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.195 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Beginning in the 2019-2020 school year, local boards shall require each
public elementary and secondary school to display the national motto of the
United States, "In God We Trust," in a prominent location in the school.
(b) The display required in paragraph (a) of this subsection may take the form of
but is not limited to a mounted plaque or student artwork.
(c) For purposes of this section, "prominent location" means a school entryway,
cafeteria, or common area where students are likely to see the national motto.
(2) Local boards may allow any teacher or administrator in a public school district of
the Commonwealth to read or post in a public school building, classroom, or event
any excerpts or portions of: the national motto; the national anthem; the pledge of
allegiance; the preamble to the Kentucky Constitution; the Declaration of
Independence; the Mayflower Compact; the Ten Commandments; the writings,
speeches, documents, and proclamations of the founding fathers and presidents of
the United States; United States Supreme Court decisions; and acts of the United
States Congress including the published text of the Congressional Record. There
shall be no content-based censorship of American history or heritage in the
Commonwealth based on religious references in these writings, documents, and
records.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/20/2024 1:38 PM Jacketed